Utah statutes.
64-13-34.   Safety of offenders.

In case of disaster or acts of God that threaten the safety of inmates or the security of a secure correctional facility, inmates may be moved to a suitable place of security.  Inmates shall be returned to a correctional facility as soon as it is practicable.

